District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.02

Prohibitions.

(a)

A supervisor shall not threaten to take or take a prohibited personnel action or otherwise retaliate against an employee because of the employee’s protected disclosure or because of an employee’s refusal to comply with an illegal order.

(b)

A District government official or employee having the responsibility to evaluate, award, authorize payments, terminate, or otherwise administer a contract for goods or services between the District government and a contractor shall not threaten to take or take a prohibited procurement action against a contractor, or a contractor competing for a contract, based wholly or in part on a protected disclosure made by an employee, officer, or owner of the contractor to a public body.

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 203, 45 DCR 5147
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-117, § 3(b), 57 DCR 896
This section is referenced in § 1-615.55, § 2-223.03, and § 2-223.04.
1981 Ed., § 1-1177.2.
D.C. Law 18-117 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “A supervisor shall not threaten to take or take a prohibited personnel action or otherwise retaliate against an employee because of the employee’s protected disclosure or because of an employee’s refusal to comply with an illegal order.”
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.